test/src/gt-norm-yamls/V-daliit_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Verb - dalīt: # Verb 'eng divide/fin jakaa' - full paradigm /http://ezis.ailab.lv:8182/inflect/json/en/dalīt/
     dalīt+V+TV+Inf: dalīt
     dalīt+V+TV+Ind+Fut+Sg1: dalīšu
     dalīt+V+TV+Ind+Fut+Sg2: dalīsi
     dalīt+V+TV+Ind+Fut+Pl1: dalīsim
     dalīt+V+TV+Ind+Fut+Pl2: dalīsiet
     dalīt+V+TV+Ind+Fut+SP3: dalīs

     dalīt+V+TV+Ind+Prs+Sg1: dalu
     dalīt+V+TV+Ind+Prs+Sg2: dali
     dalīt+V+TV+Ind+Prs+Pl1: dalām
     dalīt+V+TV+Ind+Prs+Pl2: dalāt
     dalīt+V+TV+Ind+Prs+SP3: dala

     dalīt+V+TV+Ind+Act+Prt+Sg1: dalīju
     dalīt+V+TV+Ind+Act+Prt+Sg2: dalīji
     dalīt+V+TV+Ind+Act+Prt+Pl1: dalījām
     dalīt+V+TV+Ind+Act+Prt+Pl2: dalījāt
     dalīt+V+TV+Ind+Act+Prt+SP3: dalīja

     dalīt+V+TV+Deb+Prs: jādala
     dalīt+V+TV+Quo+Prs: dalot
     dalīt+V+TV+Quo+Fut: dalīšot
     dalīt+V+TV+Imprt+Sg2: dali
     dalīt+V+TV+Imprt+Pl2: daliet

     dalīt+V+TV+PrsPrc+Act+Msc+Sg+Nom+Indef: dalošs
     dalīt+V+TV+PrsPrc+Act+Msc+Sg+Gen+Indef: daloša
     dalīt+V+TV+PrsPrc+Act+Msc+Sg+Dat+Indef: dalošam
     dalīt+V+TV+PrsPrc+Act+Msc+Sg+Acc+Indef: dalošu
     dalīt+V+TV+PrsPrc+Act+Msc+Sg+Loc+Indef: dalošā
     dalīt+V+TV+PrsPrc+Act+Msc+Pl+Nom+Indef: daloši
     dalīt+V+TV+PrsPrc+Act+Msc+Pl+Gen+Indef: dalošu
     dalīt+V+TV+PrsPrc+Act+Msc+Pl+Dat+Indef: dalošiem
     dalīt+V+TV+PrsPrc+Act+Msc+Pl+Acc+Indef: dalošus
     dalīt+V+TV+PrsPrc+Act+Msc+Pl+Loc+Indef: dalošos
     dalīt+V+TV+PrsPrc+Act+Msc+Sg+Nom+Def: dalošais
     dalīt+V+TV+PrsPrc+Act+Msc+Sg+Gen+Def: dalošā
     dalīt+V+TV+PrsPrc+Act+Msc+Sg+Dat+Def: dalošajam
     dalīt+V+TV+PrsPrc+Act+Msc+Sg+Acc+Def: dalošo
     dalīt+V+TV+PrsPrc+Act+Msc+Sg+Loc+Def: dalošajā
     dalīt+V+TV+PrsPrc+Act+Msc+Sg+Voc+Def: [dalošais, dalošo]
     dalīt+V+TV+PrsPrc+Act+Msc+Pl+Nom+Def: dalošie
     dalīt+V+TV+PrsPrc+Act+Msc+Pl+Gen+Def: dalošo
     dalīt+V+TV+PrsPrc+Act+Msc+Pl+Dat+Def: dalošajiem
     dalīt+V+TV+PrsPrc+Act+Msc+Pl+Acc+Def: dalošos
     dalīt+V+TV+PrsPrc+Act+Msc+Pl+Loc+Def: dalošajos
     dalīt+V+TV+PrsPrc+Act+Msc+Pl+Voc+Def: dalošie
     dalīt+V+TV+PrsPrc+Act+Fem+Sg+Nom+Indef: daloša
     dalīt+V+TV+PrsPrc+Act+Fem+Sg+Gen+Indef: dalošas
     dalīt+V+TV+PrsPrc+Act+Fem+Sg+Dat+Indef: dalošai
     dalīt+V+TV+PrsPrc+Act+Fem+Sg+Acc+Indef: dalošu
     dalīt+V+TV+PrsPrc+Act+Fem+Sg+Loc+Indef: dalošā
     dalīt+V+TV+PrsPrc+Act+Fem+Pl+Nom+Indef: dalošas
     dalīt+V+TV+PrsPrc+Act+Fem+Pl+Gen+Indef: dalošu
     dalīt+V+TV+PrsPrc+Act+Fem+Pl+Dat+Indef: dalošām
     dalīt+V+TV+PrsPrc+Act+Fem+Pl+Acc+Indef: dalošas
     dalīt+V+TV+PrsPrc+Act+Fem+Pl+Loc+Indef: dalošās
     dalīt+V+TV+PrsPrc+Act+Fem+Sg+Nom+Def: dalošā
     dalīt+V+TV+PrsPrc+Act+Fem+Sg+Gen+Def: dalošās
     dalīt+V+TV+PrsPrc+Act+Fem+Sg+Dat+Def: dalošajai
     dalīt+V+TV+PrsPrc+Act+Fem+Sg+Acc+Def: dalošo
     dalīt+V+TV+PrsPrc+Act+Fem+Sg+Loc+Def: dalošajā
     dalīt+V+TV+PrsPrc+Act+Fem+Sg+Voc+Def: dalošā
     dalīt+V+TV+PrsPrc+Act+Fem+Pl+Nom+Def: dalošās
     dalīt+V+TV+PrsPrc+Act+Fem+Pl+Gen+Def: dalošo
     dalīt+V+TV+PrsPrc+Act+Fem+Pl+Dat+Def: dalošajām
     dalīt+V+TV+PrsPrc+Act+Fem+Pl+Acc+Def: dalošās
     dalīt+V+TV+PrsPrc+Act+Fem+Pl+Loc+Def: dalošajās
     dalīt+V+TV+PrsPrc+Act+Fem+Pl+Voc+Def: dalošās

     dalīt+V+TV+PrfPrc+Act+Msc+Sg+Nom+Indef: dalījis
     dalīt+V+TV+PrfPrc+Act+Msc+Sg+Gen+Indef: dalījuša
     dalīt+V+TV+PrfPrc+Act+Msc+Sg+Dat+Indef: dalījušam
     dalīt+V+TV+PrfPrc+Act+Msc+Sg+Acc+Indef: dalījušu
     dalīt+V+TV+PrfPrc+Act+Msc+Sg+Loc+Indef: dalījušā
     dalīt+V+TV+PrfPrc+Act+Msc+Pl+Nom+Indef: dalījuši
     dalīt+V+TV+PrfPrc+Act+Msc+Pl+Gen+Indef: dalījušu
     dalīt+V+TV+PrfPrc+Act+Msc+Pl+Dat+Indef: dalījušiem
     dalīt+V+TV+PrfPrc+Act+Msc+Pl+Acc+Indef: dalījušus
     dalīt+V+TV+PrfPrc+Act+Msc+Pl+Loc+Indef: dalījušos
     dalīt+V+TV+PrfPrc+Act+Msc+Sg+Nom+Def: dalījušais
     dalīt+V+TV+PrfPrc+Act+Msc+Sg+Gen+Def: dalījušā
     dalīt+V+TV+PrfPrc+Act+Msc+Sg+Dat+Def: dalījušajam
     dalīt+V+TV+PrfPrc+Act+Msc+Sg+Acc+Def: dalījušo
     dalīt+V+TV+PrfPrc+Act+Msc+Sg+Loc+Def: dalījušajā
     dalīt+V+TV+PrfPrc+Act+Msc+Sg+Voc+Def: dalījušais
     dalīt+V+TV+PrfPrc+Act+Msc+Pl+Nom+Def: dalījušie
     dalīt+V+TV+PrfPrc+Act+Msc+Pl+Gen+Def: dalījušo
     dalīt+V+TV+PrfPrc+Act+Msc+Pl+Dat+Def: dalījušajiem
     dalīt+V+TV+PrfPrc+Act+Msc+Pl+Acc+Def: dalījušos
     dalīt+V+TV+PrfPrc+Act+Msc+Pl+Loc+Def: dalījušajos
     dalīt+V+TV+PrfPrc+Act+Msc+Pl+Voc+Def: dalījušie
     dalīt+V+TV+PrfPrc+Act+Fem+Sg+Nom+Indef: dalījusi
     dalīt+V+TV+PrfPrc+Act+Fem+Sg+Gen+Indef: dalījušas
     dalīt+V+TV+PrfPrc+Act+Fem+Sg+Dat+Indef: dalījušai
     dalīt+V+TV+PrfPrc+Act+Fem+Sg+Acc+Indef: dalījušu
     dalīt+V+TV+PrfPrc+Act+Fem+Sg+Loc+Indef: dalījušā
     dalīt+V+TV+PrfPrc+Act+Fem+Pl+Nom+Indef: dalījušas
     dalīt+V+TV+PrfPrc+Act+Fem+Pl+Gen+Indef: dalījušu
     dalīt+V+TV+PrfPrc+Act+Fem+Pl+Dat+Indef: dalījušām
     dalīt+V+TV+PrfPrc+Act+Fem+Pl+Acc+Indef: dalījušas
     dalīt+V+TV+PrfPrc+Act+Fem+Pl+Loc+Indef: dalījušās
     dalīt+V+TV+PrfPrc+Act+Fem+Sg+Nom+Def: dalījusī
     dalīt+V+TV+PrfPrc+Act+Fem+Sg+Gen+Def: dalījušās
     dalīt+V+TV+PrfPrc+Act+Fem+Sg+Dat+Def: dalījušajai
     dalīt+V+TV+PrfPrc+Act+Fem+Sg+Acc+Def: dalījušo
     dalīt+V+TV+PrfPrc+Act+Fem+Sg+Loc+Def: dalījušajā
     dalīt+V+TV+PrfPrc+Act+Fem+Sg+Voc+Def: dalījusī
     dalīt+V+TV+PrfPrc+Act+Fem+Pl+Nom+Def: dalījušās
     dalīt+V+TV+PrfPrc+Act+Fem+Pl+Gen+Def: dalījušo
     dalīt+V+TV+PrfPrc+Act+Fem+Pl+Dat+Def: dalījušajām
     dalīt+V+TV+PrfPrc+Act+Fem+Pl+Acc+Def: dalījušās
     dalīt+V+TV+PrfPrc+Act+Fem+Pl+Loc+Def: dalījušajās
     dalīt+V+TV+PrfPrc+Act+Fem+Pl+Voc+Def: dalījušās

     dalīt+V+TV+PrsPrc+Pss+Msc+Sg+Nom+Indef: dalāms
     dalīt+V+TV+PrsPrc+Pss+Msc+Sg+Gen+Indef: dalāma
     dalīt+V+TV+PrsPrc+Pss+Msc+Sg+Dat+Indef: dalāmam
     dalīt+V+TV+PrsPrc+Pss+Msc+Sg+Acc+Indef: dalāmu
     dalīt+V+TV+PrsPrc+Pss+Msc+Sg+Loc+Indef: dalāmā
     dalīt+V+TV+PrsPrc+Pss+Msc+Pl+Nom+Indef: dalāmi
     dalīt+V+TV+PrsPrc+Pss+Msc+Pl+Gen+Indef: dalāmu
     dalīt+V+TV+PrsPrc+Pss+Msc+Pl+Dat+Indef: dalāmiem
     dalīt+V+TV+PrsPrc+Pss+Msc+Pl+Acc+Indef: dalāmus
     dalīt+V+TV+PrsPrc+Pss+Msc+Pl+Loc+Indef: dalāmos
     dalīt+V+TV+PrsPrc+Pss+Msc+Sg+Nom+Def: dalāmais
     dalīt+V+TV+PrsPrc+Pss+Msc+Sg+Gen+Def: dalāmā
     dalīt+V+TV+PrsPrc+Pss+Msc+Sg+Dat+Def: dalāmajam
     dalīt+V+TV+PrsPrc+Pss+Msc+Sg+Acc+Def: dalāmo
     dalīt+V+TV+PrsPrc+Pss+Msc+Sg+Loc+Def: dalāmajā
     dalīt+V+TV+PrsPrc+Pss+Msc+Sg+Voc+Def: [dalāmais, dalāmo]
     dalīt+V+TV+PrsPrc+Pss+Msc+Pl+Nom+Def: dalāmie
     dalīt+V+TV+PrsPrc+Pss+Msc+Pl+Gen+Def: dalāmo
     dalīt+V+TV+PrsPrc+Pss+Msc+Pl+Dat+Def: dalāmajiem
     dalīt+V+TV+PrsPrc+Pss+Msc+Pl+Acc+Def: dalāmos
     dalīt+V+TV+PrsPrc+Pss+Msc+Pl+Loc+Def: dalāmajos
     dalīt+V+TV+PrsPrc+Pss+Msc+Pl+Voc+Def: dalāmie
     dalīt+V+TV+PrsPrc+Pss+Fem+Sg+Nom+Indef: dalāma
     dalīt+V+TV+PrsPrc+Pss+Fem+Sg+Gen+Indef: dalāmas
     dalīt+V+TV+PrsPrc+Pss+Fem+Sg+Dat+Indef: dalāmai
     dalīt+V+TV+PrsPrc+Pss+Fem+Sg+Acc+Indef: dalāmu
     dalīt+V+TV+PrsPrc+Pss+Fem+Sg+Loc+Indef: dalāmā
     dalīt+V+TV+PrsPrc+Pss+Fem+Pl+Nom+Indef: dalāmas
     dalīt+V+TV+PrsPrc+Pss+Fem+Pl+Gen+Indef: dalāmu
     dalīt+V+TV+PrsPrc+Pss+Fem+Pl+Dat+Indef: dalāmām
     dalīt+V+TV+PrsPrc+Pss+Fem+Pl+Acc+Indef: dalāmas
     dalīt+V+TV+PrsPrc+Pss+Fem+Pl+Loc+Indef: dalāmās
     dalīt+V+TV+PrsPrc+Pss+Fem+Sg+Nom+Def: dalāmā
     dalīt+V+TV+PrsPrc+Pss+Fem+Sg+Gen+Def: dalāmās
     dalīt+V+TV+PrsPrc+Pss+Fem+Sg+Dat+Def: dalāmajai
     dalīt+V+TV+PrsPrc+Pss+Fem+Sg+Acc+Def: dalāmo
     dalīt+V+TV+PrsPrc+Pss+Fem+Sg+Loc+Def: dalāmajā
     dalīt+V+TV+PrsPrc+Pss+Fem+Sg+Voc+Def: dalāmā
     dalīt+V+TV+PrsPrc+Pss+Fem+Pl+Nom+Def: dalāmās
     dalīt+V+TV+PrsPrc+Pss+Fem+Pl+Gen+Def: dalāmo
     dalīt+V+TV+PrsPrc+Pss+Fem+Pl+Dat+Def: dalāmajām
     dalīt+V+TV+PrsPrc+Pss+Fem+Pl+Acc+Def: dalāmās
     dalīt+V+TV+PrsPrc+Pss+Fem+Pl+Loc+Def: dalāmajās
     dalīt+V+TV+PrsPrc+Pss+Fem+Pl+Voc+Def: dalāmās

     dalīt+V+TV+PrfPrc+Pss+Msc+Sg+Nom+Indef: dalīts
     dalīt+V+TV+PrfPrc+Pss+Msc+Sg+Gen+Indef: dalīta
     dalīt+V+TV+PrfPrc+Pss+Msc+Sg+Dat+Indef: dalītam
     dalīt+V+TV+PrfPrc+Pss+Msc+Sg+Acc+Indef: dalītu
     dalīt+V+TV+PrfPrc+Pss+Msc+Sg+Loc+Indef: dalītā
     dalīt+V+TV+PrfPrc+Pss+Msc+Pl+Nom+Indef: dalīti
     dalīt+V+TV+PrfPrc+Pss+Msc+Pl+Gen+Indef: dalītu
     dalīt+V+TV+PrfPrc+Pss+Msc+Pl+Dat+Indef: dalītiem
     dalīt+V+TV+PrfPrc+Pss+Msc+Pl+Acc+Indef: dalītus
     dalīt+V+TV+PrfPrc+Pss+Msc+Pl+Loc+Indef: dalītos
     dalīt+V+TV+PrfPrc+Pss+Msc+Sg+Nom+Def: dalītais
     dalīt+V+TV+PrfPrc+Pss+Msc+Sg+Gen+Def: dalītā
     dalīt+V+TV+PrfPrc+Pss+Msc+Sg+Dat+Def: dalītajam
     dalīt+V+TV+PrfPrc+Pss+Msc+Sg+Acc+Def: dalīto
     dalīt+V+TV+PrfPrc+Pss+Msc+Sg+Loc+Def: dalītajā
     dalīt+V+TV+PrfPrc+Pss+Msc+Sg+Voc+Def: [dalītais, dalīto]
     dalīt+V+TV+PrfPrc+Pss+Msc+Pl+Nom+Def: dalītie
     dalīt+V+TV+PrfPrc+Pss+Msc+Pl+Gen+Def: dalīto
     dalīt+V+TV+PrfPrc+Pss+Msc+Pl+Dat+Def: dalītajiem
     dalīt+V+TV+PrfPrc+Pss+Msc+Pl+Acc+Def: dalītos
     dalīt+V+TV+PrfPrc+Pss+Msc+Pl+Loc+Def: dalītajos
     dalīt+V+TV+PrfPrc+Pss+Msc+Pl+Voc+Def: dalītie
     dalīt+V+TV+PrfPrc+Pss+Fem+Sg+Nom+Indef: dalīta
     dalīt+V+TV+PrfPrc+Pss+Fem+Sg+Gen+Indef: dalītas
     dalīt+V+TV+PrfPrc+Pss+Fem+Sg+Dat+Indef: dalītai
     dalīt+V+TV+PrfPrc+Pss+Fem+Sg+Acc+Indef: dalītu
     dalīt+V+TV+PrfPrc+Pss+Fem+Sg+Loc+Indef: dalītā
     dalīt+V+TV+PrfPrc+Pss+Fem+Pl+Nom+Indef: dalītas
     dalīt+V+TV+PrfPrc+Pss+Fem+Pl+Gen+Indef: dalītu
     dalīt+V+TV+PrfPrc+Pss+Fem+Pl+Dat+Indef: dalītām
     dalīt+V+TV+PrfPrc+Pss+Fem+Pl+Acc+Indef: dalītas
     dalīt+V+TV+PrfPrc+Pss+Fem+Pl+Loc+Indef: dalītās
     dalīt+V+TV+PrfPrc+Pss+Fem+Sg+Nom+Def: dalītā
     dalīt+V+TV+PrfPrc+Pss+Fem+Sg+Gen+Def: dalītās
     dalīt+V+TV+PrfPrc+Pss+Fem+Sg+Dat+Def: dalītajai
     dalīt+V+TV+PrfPrc+Pss+Fem+Sg+Acc+Def: dalīto
     dalīt+V+TV+PrfPrc+Pss+Fem+Sg+Loc+Def: dalītajā
     dalīt+V+TV+PrfPrc+Pss+Fem+Sg+Voc+Def: dalītā
     dalīt+V+TV+PrfPrc+Pss+Fem+Pl+Nom+Def: dalītās
     dalīt+V+TV+PrfPrc+Pss+Fem+Pl+Gen+Def: dalīto
     dalīt+V+TV+PrfPrc+Pss+Fem+Pl+Dat+Def: dalītajām
     dalīt+V+TV+PrfPrc+Pss+Fem+Pl+Acc+Def: dalītās
     dalīt+V+TV+PrfPrc+Pss+Fem+Pl+Loc+Def: dalītajās
     dalīt+V+TV+PrfPrc+Pss+Fem+Pl+Voc+Def: dalītās
#"Declension":"4"
     dalīt+V+TV+Der/šana+N+Fem+Sg+Nom: dalīšana
     dalīt+V+TV+Der/šana+N+Fem+Sg+Gen: dalīšanas
     dalīt+V+TV+Der/šana+N+Fem+Sg+Dat: dalīšanai
     dalīt+V+TV+Der/šana+N+Fem+Sg+Acc: dalīšanu
     dalīt+V+TV+Der/šana+N+Fem+Sg+Loc: dalīšanā
     dalīt+V+TV+Der/šana+N+Fem+Sg+Voc: dalīšana
     dalīt+V+TV+Der/šana+N+Fem+Pl+Nom: dalīšanas
     dalīt+V+TV+Der/šana+N+Fem+Pl+Gen: dalīšanu
     dalīt+V+TV+Der/šana+N+Fem+Pl+Dat: dalīšanām
     dalīt+V+TV+Der/šana+N+Fem+Pl+Acc: dalīšanas
     dalīt+V+TV+Der/šana+N+Fem+Pl+Loc: dalīšanās
     dalīt+V+TV+Der/šana+N+Fem+Pl+Voc: dalīšanas
     dalīt+V+TV+PrsPrc+Act+Pred2+Msc+Sg+Nom+Indef: dalīdams
     dalīt+V+TV+PrsPrc+Act+Pred2+Fem+Sg+Nom+Indef: dalīdama
     dalīt+V+TV+PrsPrc+Act+Pred2+Msc+Pl+Nom+Indef: dalīdami
     dalīt+V+TV+PrsPrc+Act+Pred2+Fem+Pl+Nom+Indef: dalīdamas

#     dalīt+V+TV+Der/Adv+Adv+Pos: rokoši


#     dalīt+V+TV+Der/iens+N+Msc+Sg+Nom: raciens
#     dalīt+V+TV+Der/iens+N+Msc+Sg+Gen: raciena
#     dalīt+V+TV+Der/iens+N+Msc+Sg+Dat: racienam
#     dalīt+V+TV+Der/iens+N+Msc+Sg+Acc: racienu
#     dalīt+V+TV+Der/iens+N+Msc+Sg+Loc: racienā
#     dalīt+V+TV+Der/iens+N+Msc+Sg+Voc: [raciens, racien]
#     dalīt+V+TV+Der/iens+N+Msc+Pl+Nom: racieni
#     dalīt+V+TV+Der/iens+N+Msc+Pl+Gen: racienu
#     dalīt+V+TV+Der/iens+N+Msc+Pl+Dat: racieniem
#     dalīt+V+TV+Der/iens+N+Msc+Pl+Acc: racienus
#     dalīt+V+TV+Der/iens+N+Msc+Pl+Loc: racienos
#     dalīt+V+TV+Der/iens+N+Msc+Pl+Voc: racieni
